Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4106
Advisory Council on Public Guardianship;
created; members.

The Advisory Council on Public Guardianship is created.
The council shall be appointed by the State Court Administrator, be comprised
of individuals from a variety of disciplines who are knowledgeable in guardianship
and conservatorship, and be representative of the geographical and cultural
diversity of the state and reflect gender fairness. The council shall consist
of the following members: A representative of the Nebraska County Court Judges
Association, attorneys licensed to practice law in this state, social workers,
mental health professionals, professionals with expertise in the aging population,
developmental disability professionals, and other interested groups or individuals.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 6.